test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-zaljsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - zaļš: # Adjective 'eng green/fin vihreä' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/za%C4%BC%C5%A1/
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: zaļš
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: zaļa
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: zaļāka
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: zaļam
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: zaļākam
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: zaļu
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: zaļāku
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: zaļā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: zaļākā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: zaļi
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: zaļāki
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: zaļu
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: zaļāku
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: zaļiem
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: zaļākiem
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: zaļus
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: zaļākus
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: zaļos
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: zaļākos
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: zaļais
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: zaļākais
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: viszaļākais
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: zaļā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: zaļākā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: viszaļākā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: zaļajam
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: zaļākajam
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: viszaļākajam
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: zaļo
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: zaļāko
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: viszaļāko
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: zaļajā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: zaļākajā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: viszaļākajā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: zaļais
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: zaļākais
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: viszaļākais
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: zaļie
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: zaļākie
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: viszaļākie
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: zaļo
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: zaļāko
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: viszaļāko
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: zaļajiem
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: zaļākajiem
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: viszaļākajiem
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: zaļos
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: zaļākos
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: viszaļākos
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: zaļajos
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: zaļākajos
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: viszaļākajos
     zaļš+A+Pos+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: zaļie
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: zaļākie
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: viszaļākie
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: zaļa
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: zaļāka
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: zaļas
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: zaļākas
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: zaļai
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: zaļākai
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: zaļu
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: zaļāku
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: zaļā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: zaļākā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: zaļas
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: zaļākas
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: zaļu
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: zaļāku
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: zaļām
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: zaļākām
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: zaļas
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: zaļākas
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: zaļās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: zaļākās
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: zaļā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: zaļākā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: viszaļākā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: zaļās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: zaļākās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: viszaļākās
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: zaļajai
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: zaļākajai
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: viszaļākajai
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: zaļo
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: zaļāko
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: viszaļāko
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: zaļajā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: zaļākajā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: viszaļākajā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: zaļā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: zaļākā
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: viszaļākā
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: zaļās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: zaļākās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: viszaļākās
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: zaļo
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: zaļāko
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: viszaļāko
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: zaļajām
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: zaļākajām
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: viszaļākajām
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: zaļās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: zaļākās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: viszaļākās
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: zaļajās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: zaļākajās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: viszaļākajās
     zaļš+A+Pos+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: zaļās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: zaļākās
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Superl+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: viszaļākās
     zaļš+A+Pos+Der/Adv+Adv: zaļi
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: zaļāks
     zaļš+A+Der/āk+Comp+Der/Adv+Adv: zaļāk
